Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.080

Supervising dentist and supervising dental therapists—Responsibilities.

A supervising dentist or supervising dental therapist is responsible for:

(1) Maintaining the appropriate level of supervision for dental assistants and expanded function dental auxiliaries; and

(2) Ensuring that the dental assistants and expanded function dental auxiliaries that the dentist or dental therapist supervises are able to competently perform the tasks that they are assigned.

[ 2023 c 460 s 19; 2007 c 269 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.